Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1518
Fees.

The department shall establish and collect fees for credentialing
activities under the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act as
provided in sections 38-151 to 38-157.

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 159;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 80;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 127;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-4714.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 582;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 36.